Utah statutes.
59-2-1335.   Abbreviations permitted in proceedings.

(1)  In all proceedings relating to assessment, levy, or collection of taxes or the subjection of any property to a charge for taxes of any nature, or the advertisement and sale of any property for taxes, the following initial letters, abbreviations, symbols, and figures may be used. The meaning of the initial letters, abbreviations, symbols, and figures is shown by the word or words placed opposite the initial letters, abbreviations, symbols, and figures:

a., ac.	................................................................................................................................ acre, acres

add. 	...................................................................................................................................... addition

ave. 	........................................................................................................................................ avenue

beg. 	................................................................................................................................... beginning

blk. 	........................................................................................................................................... block

bet. 	....................................................................................................................................... between

bdy., bdrs. 	....................................................................................................... boundary, boundaries

ch., chs. 	........................................................................................................................ chain, chains

com. 	.............................................................................................................................. commencing

cont. 	.................................................................................................................................. containing

deg. or degree symbol 	.............................................................................................. degree, degrees

dist. 	...................................................................................................................................... distance

E. 	................................................................................................................................................ east

E'ly 	........................................................................................................................................ easterly

ft. 	........................................................................................................................................ foot, feet

frac. 	................................................................................................................................... fractional

in., ins. 	........................................................................................................................... inch, inches

lk., lks. 	.............................................................................................................................. link, links

lt., lts. 	.................................................................................................................................... lot, lots

m., min., or ' 	............................................................................................................ minute, minutes

m. or l. 	.......................................................................................................................... more or less

N. 	.............................................................................................................................................. north

NE. 	..................................................................................................................................... northeast

NE'ly. 	........................................................................................................................... northeasterly

N'ly. 	.................................................................................................................................... northerly

NW. 	................................................................................................................................... northwest

NW'ly. 	........................................................................................................................ northwesterly

pt. 	.............................................................................................................................................. point

1/4 sec. 	...................................................................................................................... quarter section

r., rs. 	............................................................................................................................. range, ranges

rd., rds. 	................................................................................................................................ rod, rods

R. of W. 	....................................................................................................................... right-of-way

s. or " 	....................................................................................................................... second, seconds

S. 	.............................................................................................................................................. south

SE. 	...................................................................................................................................... southeast

SE'ly. 	........................................................................................................................... southeasterly

S'ly. 	.................................................................................................................................... southerly

st. 	.............................................................................................................................................. street

sub. 	................................................................................................................................. subdivision

S.L.M. 	................................................................................................................ Salt Lake Meridian

SW. 	................................................................................................................................... southwest

t., tp., tps. 	......................................................................................................... township, townships

th. 	........................................................................................................................................... thence

U.S. sur. 	............................................................................................................ United State Survey

U.S.M. 	....................................................................................................... Uintah Special Meridian

W. 	...............................................................................................................................................west

W'ly. 	.....................................................................................................................................westerly

(2)  Where the name of any railroad or railroad company is commonly referred to by the initial letters of the word constituting the name of the railroad, the initial letters may be used as an abbreviation for the full name of the railroad or railroad company in all cases where the name is used in the description of property.

(3)  Commonly accepted initial letters, abbreviations, symbols, and figures having local significance may be used.  Any initial letters, abbreviations, symbols, and figures shall first be approved by the commission.  A written or printed explanation of initial letters, abbreviations, symbols, and figures shall appear in each assessment roll in which they are used and shall be published with each separate advertisement and sale for taxes in which they are used.

